Mississippi, session 2026, HB1714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Sections 1 through 14 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "Make Mississippi Resilient and Strong Act." SECTION 2.  (1)  The purpose of Sections 1 through 14 of this act is to promote the state's welfare and economic development through the strengthening of residential homes and commercial properties to protect against severe weather and to establish a mechanism to allow the availability of a grant program to encourage single-family, site-built, owner-occupied, residential property owners or commercial property owners to retrofit their properties to make them less vulnerable to hurricane, tornado or other catastrophic windstorm events. (2)  To provide this resiliency and economic protection, an association of member insurers is created to make, subject to certain limitations, financial grants to retrofit insurable property to standards adopted by the association. SECTION 3.  (1)  Any person who owns insurable property located in this state may apply to the association for a grant to retrofit such insurable property. (2) To obtain grant funds, insurable property shall be retrofitted to one of the tiered mitigation levels as defined by the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety, or other mitigation program, or construction technique, that is recommended by the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Coordinating Council and approved by the association and the commissioner.  An insurable property shall be certified as conforming to the most recent version of the "fortified roof" standard of the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety only after evaluation and certification by an Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety certified evaluator. (3) Total grants awarded for any insurable property shall not exceed Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00). SECTION 4.  As used in Sections 1 through 14 of this act, the following terms have the meanings provided in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Applicant" means any person who submits an application for a grant award from the association. (b)  "Association" means the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Association. (c)  "Board" means the board of directors of the association. (d) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Insurance of this state. (e)  "Insurable property" includes single-family residential and commercial property.  "Insurance property" also includes modular homes satisfying the codes, standards or techniques as provided in Section 83-75-1 or 83-75-3.  Manufactured homes are excluded from "insurable property," except as expressly provided in Section 83-75-3(3). (f)  "Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety" means the non-profit scientific research and communications organization supported by property insurers, reinsurers and affiliated companies. (g) "Member insurer" means any entity that is authorized in this state to write property insurance coverage or provides property insurance coverage in this state.  Such term shall not include nonadmitted insurers eligible for writing business in this state or writing business in this state. (h) "Person" means a natural person, trust, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or any other business entity. (i) "Premiums" mean amounts or considerations (by whatever name called) received on property insurance policies less returned premiums thereon and dividends paid or credited to policyholders on such business. (j) "Property insurance" means the following lines of coverage as reported on the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Annual Statement blank for fire, allied lines, homeowners, commercial multiple peril (non-liability portion) and earthquake insurance. (k) "Retrofit" means to make changes to an existing building to resist loss due to hurricane, tornado or other catastrophic windstorm events. SECTION 5.  (1)  There is created a nonprofit legal entity to be known as the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Association.  All member insurers shall be and remain members of the association, as a condition of their authority to transact insurance business in this state.  The association shall perform its functions under a plan of operation established and approved under Section 9 of this act and shall exercise its powers through a board of directors established under Section 6 of this act. (2)  The association shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state.  Meetings or records of the association may be opened to the public upon majority vote of the board of directors of the association. SECTION 6. (1)  The board of directors of the association shall consist of the following members: (a)  Two (2) members appointed by the Commissioner of Insurance, with each being appointed from different regions of the state; (b)  Three (3) members appointed by the Governor, with one (1) being appointed from each of the state Supreme Court districts as those districts existed on July 1, 2026; (c)  Three (3) members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, with one (1) being appointed from each of the state Supreme Court districts as those districts existed on July 1, 2026; and (d)  Three (3) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, with one (1) being appointed from each of the state Supreme Court districts as those districts existed on July 1, 2026. In making appointments to the board, each appointing authority shall select persons who possess expertise in different professions or occupations; however, all appointees must possess expertise in the field of either insurance, construction or finance. (2)  Members of the board shall serve staggered terms of three (3) years, with the initial terms as follows: (a)  Of the appointees selected by the commissioner, one (1) shall serve a term of one (1) year and one (1) shall serve a term of three (3) years, to be determined by the commissioner when making the appointments; (b)  Of the appointees selected by the Governor, one (1) shall serve a term of one (1) year, one (1) shall serve a term of two (2) years, and one (1) shall serve a term of three (3) years, to be determined by the Governor when making the appointments; (c)  Of the appointees selected by the Lieutenant Governor, one (1) shall serve a term of one (1) year, one (1) shall serve a term of two (2) years, and one (1) shall serve a term of three (3) years, to be determined by the Lieutenant Governor when making the appointments; and (d)  Of the appointees selected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one (1) shall serve a term of one (1) year, one (1) shall serve a term of two (2) years, and one (1) shall serve a term of three (3) years, to be determined by the Speaker when making the appointments. Upon the expiration of the initial terms of office, all subsequent appointments shall be made for a term of three (3) years. (3)  Initial appointments to the board must be made before August 1, 2026.  No later than thirty (30) days after the initial appointments are made, the Governor shall give notice to all members of the board of the time and place of an organizational meeting of the board. (4)  Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the remaining period of a term by the appointing authority of the member who is vacating the board. (5)  For attending meetings of the board of directors, members shall be reimbursed from the assets of the association for actual and necessary expenses incurred, as authorized under Section 25-3-41; however, members of the board may not be paid any additional compensation for their service as board members. SECTION 7. (1)  In addition to the rights and powers elsewhere in Sections 1 through 14 of this act, the association may: (a)  Enter into such contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and purposes of this act including contractual agreements with third parties, including the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association and the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Coordinating Council, for the purposes of developing and implementing windstorm mitigation programs; (b)  Sue or be sued, including taking any legal actions necessary or proper to recover or collect monies due the association under Section 8 of this act and to settle claims or potential claims against it; (c)  Borrow money to affect the purposes of this act; any notes or other evidence of indebtedness of the association not in default shall be legal investments for domestic insurers and may be carried as admitted assets; (d)  Employ or retain such persons as are necessary or appropriate to handle the financial transactions of the association, and to perform such other functions as become necessary or proper under Sections 1 through 14 of this act; (e)  Take such legal action as may be necessary or appropriate to: (i)  Avoid the payment of improper grants or any other expenditures by the association; (ii)  Recover any amounts erroneously or improperly paid by the association; (iii)  Recover any amounts paid by the association as a result of mistake of fact or law; (iv)  Recover other amounts due the association. (f)  Organize itself as a corporation or in other legal form permitted by the laws of the state; (g)  Request information from a person seeking a grant from the association in order to aid the association in determining its obligations under this act with respect to the person, and the person shall promptly comply with the request; and (h)  Take other necessary or appropriate action to discharge its duties and obligations under this act or to exercise its powers under Sections 1 through 14 of this act. (2)  The association may join an organization of one or more other state associations of similar purposes, to further the purposes and administer the powers and duties of the association. (3)  The board of directors of the association shall have discretion and may exercise a reasonable business judgment to determine the means by which the association is to provide the benefits of this act in an economical and efficient manner. (4)  The board of directors of the association may contract with a third-party person or entity to make determinations on grant awards, which third-party person or entity must be granted full discretion in determining the amount of awards. (5) Venue in a suit against the association arising under the act shall be in Hinds County, Mississippi.  The association shall not be required to give an appeal bond in an appeal that relates to a cause of action arising under this act. SECTION 8.  For the purpose of providing the funds necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Association, in addition to those fees required under Section 83-5-73, all member insurers shall pay a supplemental fee to the commissioner in the amount of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for the filing and processing of an agent's certificate of authority for deposit into the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Association Fund created under Section 10 of this act. SECTION 9.  (1)  (a)  The association shall submit to the commissioner a plan of operation and any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable and equitable administration of the association.  The plan of operation and any amendments thereto shall become effective upon the commissioner's written approval or unless it has not been disapproved within thirty (30) days. (b) If the association fails to submit a suitable plan of operation within one hundred eighty (180) days following the effective date of this act, or if at any time thereafter the association fails to submit suitable amendments to the plan, the commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules as are necessary or advisable to effectuate the provisions of this act.  Such rules shall continue in force until modified by the commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by the association and approved by the commissioner. (2)  All member insurers shall comply with the plan of operation. (3)  The plan of operation shall, in addition to requirements enumerated elsewhere in this act: (a)  Establish the procedures whereby all the power and duties of the association under this act will be performed; (b)  Establish procedures for handling the assets of the association; (c)  Establish the amount and method of reimbursing members of the board of directors under Section 6 of this act; (d)  Establish the procedures by which grant applications may be filed with the association and establish acceptable forms of proof of eligibility to receive grant funds; (e)  Establish or adopt mitigation standards required to be achieved and certifications required to be obtained in order to receive grant funds; (f)  Establish regular places and times for meetings, including telephone conference calls of the board of directors; (g)  Establish procedures for records to be kept of all financial transactions of the association, its agents and the board of directors; (h)  Contain additional provisions necessary or proper for the execution of the powers and duties of the association; (i)  Establish procedures whereby a director may be removed for cause, including in the case where a member insurer director becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer; and (j)  Require the board of directors to establish a policy and procedures for addressing conflicts of interests. SECTION 10.    There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Association Fund" to be administered by the Department of Finance and Administration.  The special fund shall consist of monies collected and paid to the credit of the fund by the commissioner under Section 8 of this act and monies from any other source designated for deposit into the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be allocated for the purpose of providing the funds necessary for the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Association to carry out the provisions of Sections 1 through 14 of this act.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 11.  The association shall be subject to examination and regulation by the commissioner.  The board of directors shall submit to the commissioner and the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER), each year not later than one hundred fifty (150) days after the association's fiscal year, a financial report in a form approved by the commissioner and a report of its activities during the preceding fiscal year. Upon the request of a member insurer, the association shall provide the member insurer with a copy of the report. SECTION 12.  The association shall be exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes levied by this state or any of its subdivisions, except taxes levied on real property. SECTION 13. There shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against any member insurer or its agents or employees, the association or its agents or employees, members of the board of directors, or the commissioner or his representatives, for any action or omission by them in the performance of their powers and duties under Sections 1 through 14 of this act.  This indemnity shall extend to the participation in any organization of one or more other state associations of similar purposes and to any such organization and its agents or employees. SECTION 14. The Commissioner of Insurance may promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the provisions of Sections 1 through 14 of this act. SECTION 15.  Section 83-5-73, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-5-73.  The commissioner shall collect and pay into the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund" the following fees: for certificate of authority to each general or district agent or manager, Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00); for filing and processing an agent's certificate of authority, Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00); for filing and examining statement preliminary to admission, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); for filing and processing a Form A application, Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00); for filing and auditing annual statement, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); for filing any other paper required by law, Fifty Dollars ($50.00); for continuing education courses or programs filed by the providers for approval, Fifty Dollars ($50.00); for each certification company licensed status, Forty Dollars ($40.00); for each seal when required, Twenty Dollars ($20.00); for service of process on the commissioner as attorney, Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. In addition to the user charges and fees required under this section, all member insurers, as defined in Section 4 of this act, shall pay to the commissioner the supplemental fee required under Section 8 of this act. SECTION 16.  Section 83-34-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-34-5.  The association shall, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and the plan of operation, and with respect to essential property insurance on insurable property, have the power: (a)  To issue policies of essential property insurance on insurable property to applicants; (b)  At its option, and with consent of the commissioner, to issue policies of related essential property insurance on insurable property to applicants; (c)  To purchase reinsurance for all or part of the risks of the association; (d)  To levy and collect recoupable and nonrecoupable assessments from assessable insurers; (e)  To issue bonds or incur other forms of indebtedness, including, but not limited to, loans, lines of credit or letters of credit; (f)  To establish underwriting criteria consistent with the provisions of this chapter and as approved by the commissioner; (g)  To invest and reinvest income and assets subject to the oversight of the commissioner; (h)  To enter into contractual agreements with third parties, including the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Coordinating Council and the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Association, for the purposes of developing and implementing windstorm mitigation programs; * * * and (i)  To contract with a third-party person or entity to make determinations on grant awards, which third-party or entity must be granted full discretion in determining the amount of awards; and ( * * *ij)  To exercise all other powers necessary to carry out the provisions and intent of this chapter. SECTION 17.  Section 83-34-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-1.  In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (a)  "Essential property insurance" means insurance against direct loss to property from the risk of windstorm and hail in the manner as defined and limited in the standard real property and contents insurance forms approved by the commissioner.  Essential property insurance may include coverage for either the actual cash value or replacement cost value of the structure and contents. Essential property insurance includes builders risks coverage.  The extent of risk covered, the insuring language and the exclusions are all subject to approval by the commissioner.  Policies, rules and rates shall be filed with the commissioner in the manner provided for insurance companies. (b) "Association" means the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. (c)  "Plan of operation" means the plan of operation of the association approved or promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. (d)  "Insurable property" means real property, and contents therein when requested, at fixed locations in the coast area, which property is determined by the association to be in an insurable condition and otherwise meets the underwriting requirements of the association.  Any one- or two-family dwelling built, rebuilt, altered or remodeled in compliance with the applicable building codes, including design-wind requirements, that is not otherwise rendered uninsurable by reason of use, occupancy or state of repair, shall be an insurable risk.  Neighborhood area, location and environmental hazards beyond the control of the applicant or owner of the property shall not be considered in determining insurable condition.  "Insurable property" shall not include insurance on motor vehicles or creditor placed insurance on mobile homes.  "Insurable property" includes mobile homes, modular homes or manufactured housing that are installed in compliance with applicable codes. (e) "Commissioner" means the Insurance Commissioner of the State of Mississippi. (f)  "Coast area" means Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Pearl River, Stone and George Counties. (g)  (i)  "Net direct premiums," for purposes of calculating percentages of participation for assessable insurers for the year 2007, means gross direct premiums, excluding reinsurance assumed and ceded, written on property in this state for the risk of windstorm and hail less return premiums upon cancelled contracts, dividends paid or credited to policyholders, or the unused or unabsorbed portion of premium deposits.  "Net direct premiums" includes the premium charge component for the risk of windstorm and hail to property in all policies, including multiperil and other policies that package or combine coverage for other risks.  The plan of operation shall prescribe the portion of premium allocated for the risk of windstorm and hail in multiperil and other policies that package or combine coverage for other risks.  "Net direct premiums" shall not include farm property.  "Net direct premiums" shall not include the property components of motor vehicles and other mobile property, but includes premiums for the risks of windstorm and hail for mobile homes, modular homes or manufactured housing. (ii)  "Net direct premiums," for purposes of calculating percentages of participation for assessable insurers after the year 2007, means those premiums reported by the assessable insurers in their annual statements to the Department of Insurance that were charged for insurance for any and all risks on real property and contents in the state.  The department shall determine which lines of real property and contents insurance shall be included in the calculation of net direct premiums.  The included real property and contents insurance lines may be changed from time to time in the discretion of the commissioner. "Net direct premiums" shall not include premiums for insuring farm property that are reported timely to the association as provided in the plan of operation. (iii)  The commissioner is authorized and directed to provide to the association annual statements, other reports and any statistics necessary to provide the information herein required and which the commissioner is hereby authorized and empowered to obtain from any assessable insurer. (h)  "Farm property" means property used for farming purposes; however, it shall not include any property used for dwelling purposes or any outbuildings used in connection therewith. (i)  "Losses" includes expenses for the adjustment and resolution of claims and operational and other general expenses. (j)  "Bonds, loans, lines of credit and indebtedness" include interest, finance charges, and any and all other costs associated with the financing. (k)  "Percentage of participation" for an assessable insurer means the percentage determined by dividing the assessable insurers net direct premiums written in this state in the previous year by the aggregate net direct premiums written in this state by all assessable insurers of the association in the previous year. The percentage of participation may be modified as provided in Sections 83-34-9(3) and 83-34-13(2). (l)  "Nonadmitted insurers" means those insurance companies defined in Section 83-21-17, and any other companies and persons selling insurance on risks in Mississippi that are not licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi. (m)  "Agents placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers" means those agents defined in Section 83-21-19 and any other agents placing insurance through a nonadmitted insurer. (n)  "Assessable insurer" means each and every insurer authorized to write, and engaged in writing, property insurance within this state on a direct basis. (o)  "Minimum reserve" means an amount set forth in the plan of operation which is maintained by the association for the payment of salaries and other expenses necessary for the continuous and ongoing operation of the association. (p)  "Recoupable assessment" means any assessment, in whole or in part, that is levied on and payable by assessable insurers to the association which is directly recoverable from policyholders for any covered event.  Any assessment levied due to a covered event occurring during the calendar year 2019 shall be a recoupable assessment. (q) "Nonrecoupable assessment" means any assessment levied on and payable by assessable insurers to the association which is not directly recoverable from policyholders. (r)  "Excess deficit" means a deficit that exceeds available surplus, reinsurance, recoupable and nonrecoupable assessments and other reasonably available assets of the association.  The minimum reserve, as set forth in the plan of operation, shall not be considered reasonably available assets of the association when determining whether an excess deficit has occurred. (s)  "Covered event" means an event, such as a hurricane, other windstorm or hailstorm, which causes losses covered by the policies issued by the association to its policyholders. SECTION 18.  Section 83-34-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-3.  (1)  From and after March 22, 2007, the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association, as created by Chapter 459, Laws of 1987, shall be a separate and independent entity as provided for herein.  At its option, the association may incorporate.  All assets belonging to the association on or before March 22, 2007, shall hereinafter belong to and remain with the association.  There shall be no distribution of income or assets other than for the benefit of the association, which shall have the right to invest and reinvest assets. (2)  From and after March 22, 2007, the association shall no longer have members.  Former "members" of the association shall be "assessable insurers" and shall have no rights to the assets and profits of the association, but shall have the obligation for regular assessments as provided herein.  Former members shall continue to have the obligations provided in this chapter before March 22, 2007, for all policyholder claims, costs, damages of any kind and expenses in any manner resulting from losses that occurred before March 22, 2007, for which the association may assess as needed the former members in the manner provided in this chapter before March 22, 2007.  As a condition of its authority to continue to transact the business of insurance in this state and by transacting business in this state, each licensed insurer agrees to be bound by the provisions of this statute and the plan of operation as approved by the commissioner, and all amendments and revisions thereto. (3)  Any licensed insurer first authorized to write insurance after March 22, 2007, shall become an assessable insurer on the first day of January immediately following such authorization.  The determination of such insurer's participation in the association shall be made based upon writings in the prior year in the same manner as for all other assessable insurers of the association. (4)  Except as provided for in Section 83-34-4(6), the premiums, recoupable and nonrecoupable assessments, fees, investment income and other revenue of the association are funds received for the sole purpose of providing insurance coverage, paying claims for Mississippi citizens insured by the association, securing and repaying debt obligations issued by the association, and conducting all other activities of the association, all as required or permitted by this chapter. Such revenue shall not be considered taxes, fees, licenses or charges for services imposed by the State of Mississippi on individuals, businesses, or agencies, and shall not be used for other purposes. (5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the association be and act as a nonprofit entity.  The association shall be free from taxation of every kind by the state and any political subdivision or other instrumentality thereof.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the association be tax exempt from all taxes, including federal taxes, and the association is granted the authority to take those steps necessary to obtain federal tax exempt status. (6)  Any debt obligations issued by the association, their transfer, and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and any political subdivision or other instrumentality thereof. (7)  In the event of the termination of the association by act of the Legislature, or other means, the assets of the association shall be applied first to pay all debts, liabilities and obligations of the association, including the establishment of reasonable reserves for any contingent liabilities or obligations, and all remaining assets of the association shall become property of the state. (8)  The association shall operate as a private enterprise and shall not be subject to the procurement provisions of Section 31-7-13, and policies and decisions of the association, including, but not limited to, decisions relating to incurring debt, levying of recoupable and nonrecoupable assessments, the issuance and sale of bonds, claims decisions under association policies, hiring and firing of employees, and all services relating to the operation of the association shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 25-9-101 et seq.  The association shall not be required to obtain or to hold a license or certificate of authority issued by the commissioner or any other office.  The association shall not be required to participate as a member insurer of the Mississippi Insurance Guaranty Association. SECTION 19.  Section 83-34-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-4.  (1)  Nonadmitted insurers shall not be assessable insurers of the association.  All surplus lines insurance producers placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers shall collect from the insured and remit to the association a nonadmitted policy fee on all premiums for all insurance written by such surplus lines insurance producer for a policy from a nonadmitted insurer for any and all risks in this state, except that policies or portions thereof that cover residential earthquake risks or residential flood risks that are not written through the National Flood Insurance Program shall be exempt from the nonadmitted policy fee.  By procuring or selling insurance on property in this state from a nonadmitted insurer, each surplus lines insurance producer placing insurance through a nonadmitted insurer agrees to be bound by the provisions of this chapter and to collect and remit the nonadmitted policy fee provided for herein. (2)  The nonadmitted policy fee shall be a percentage of the total policy premium but the nonadmitted policy fee shall not be considered premium and is not subject to premium taxes or commissions.  However, failure to pay the nonadmitted policy fee shall be treated the same as failure to pay premium.  "Total policy premium" includes taxes and commissions. (3)  The nonadmitted policy fee percentage shall be three percent (3%). (4)  Within twenty (20) days of the end of the quarter, surplus lines insurance producers placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers shall remit directly to the association all nonadmitted policy fees collected in the preceding quarter.  In addition to the nonadmitted policy fee provided for herein, surplus lines insurance producers placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers shall collect and remit excess deficit surcharges as provided by this chapter.  Surplus lines insurance producers placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers may designate another surplus lines insurance producer that actually procured the insurance from the nonadmitted carrier to collect and remit the nonadmitted policy fees. (5)  Each insured in this state who directly procures or renews insurance with a nonadmitted insurer on properties, risks or exposures located or to be performed, in whole or in part, in this state, other than insurance procured through a surplus lines licensee, shall be subject to the nonadmitted policy fee which shall be paid by the insured according to the procedures provided for premium taxes in Section 83-21-17(5). (6)  Monies derived from the nonadmitted policy fee collected under this section shall not be considered public funds and may be used by the association, in addition to any uses provided for in Section 83-34-3(4), for education, public outreach, training of building officials and other programs targeted to reduce the number of policies within the association; however, beginning on July 1, 2018, and ending on June 30, 2019, before any fees are remitted to the association, One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) shall be diverted and deposited into the Capital Expense Fund, and Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00) shall be diverted and deposited into the Rural Fire Truck Fund or Supplementary Rural Fire Truck Fund.  Further, beginning July 1, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2020, before any fees are remitted to the association, Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00) shall be diverted and deposited into the Rural Fire Truck Fund or Supplementary Rural Fire Truck Fund.  Further, beginning July 1, 2022, before any fees are remitted to the association but only if the association will receive at least sixty percent (60%) of the fees, Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) shall be diverted and deposited annually into the Mississippi First Responders Health and Safety Trust Fund created in Section 25-15-411.  Further, beginning July 1, 2022, but only if the association will receive at least sixty percent (60%) of the fees and the Mississippi First Responders Health and Safety Trust Fund has received the diversion of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00), Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00) shall be diverted and deposited annually into the Annual Fire Fund created in Section 17-23-21.  Further, beginning July 1, 2022, after the association has received sixty percent (60%) of the fees and after all other diversions are made, fifty percent (50%) of any excess amount shall be remitted to the association and fifty percent (50%) of any excess amount shall be diverted and deposited annually into the Annual Fire Fund. In the event the value of the association's Total Admitted Assets, as defined by the audited financial statement, is less than Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00), the monies diverted and not remitted to the association under this subsection (6) during that fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years shall immediately be diverted to the association and shall not be considered public funds. (7)  The association may use excess funds to purchase reinsurance in an amount that may exceed the total premiums collected from policyholders. SECTION 20.  Section 83-34-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-7.  (1)  The Board of Directors of the Mississippi Insurance Underwriting Association as presently constituted shall serve as the temporary board of directors of the association.  Such temporary board of directors shall prepare and submit a plan of operation in accordance with Section 83-34-13 and shall serve until the permanent board of directors shall take office in accordance with the plan of operation.  The permanent board shall consist of five (5) representatives of the members to be appointed by the temporary board of directors subject to the approval of the commissioner and three (3) agents from the coast area to be appointed by the commissioner.  The terms of the members of the board of directors in place before March 22, 2007, shall expire on March 22, 2007, and such persons shall cease to serve on the board and shall relinquish all power and control of the association. (2)  (a)  From and after March 22, 2007, the board of directors of the association shall consist of the following: (i)  The State Treasurer; (ii)  Five (5) of the assessable insurer companies, three (3) to be appointed by the commissioner, one (1) to be appointed by the Governor, and one (1) to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; each such assessable insurer appointed shall designate a representative knowledgeable in the matters of the association and authorize such representative to act and vote on its behalf; (iii)  Three (3) agents with no less than ten (10) years' experience in the property and casualty industry, two (2) of whom are residents in the coast area, and one (1) of whom is not a resident of the coast area; one (1) such coast area agent to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) such coast area agent to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, and the noncoast area agent to be appointed by the commissioner; and (iv)  Two (2) business leaders who have been residents of the coast area for no less than ten (10) years and who have no less than ten (10) years' experience in management of a business, one (1) to be appointed by the Governor, and one (1) to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor. (b)  Except for the State Treasurer, the board members shall serve three-year terms with each term beginning on January 1, and the initial terms shall be staggered in the following manner: (i)  The initial term for three (3) of the assessable insurers shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2010, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms; (ii)  The initial term for one (1) of the assessable insurers shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2009, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms; (iii)  The initial term for one (1) of the assessable insurers shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2008, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms; (iv)  The initial term for one (1) of the agents shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2010, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms; (v)  The initial term for one (1) of the agents shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2009, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms; (vi)  The initial term for one (1) of the agents shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2008, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms; (vii)  The initial term for one (1) of the business leaders shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2010, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms; (viii)  The initial term for one (1) of the business leaders shall begin on March 22, 2007, and expire on December 31, 2008, thereafter to be appointed for three-year terms. (3)  On or before March 22, 2007, the appropriate public official shall make such appointments and request such resignations from the existing board as are appropriate to comply with this section. (4)  The board shall be staffed by as many employees as it deems necessary. (5)  The board of directors has the power to act and make binding decisions on behalf of the association on all issues. SECTION 21.  Section 83-34-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-9.  (1)  All assessable insurers of the association shall participate in recoupable and nonrecoupable assessments levied by the association based upon their percentage of participation.  The association may allow affiliated insurers to combine their annual net direct premiums and other data, including data that supports any incentives that may be allowed by the association, to the extent that such grouping promotes the voluntary writing of essential property insurance in the coast area.  Any provisions for credits and grouping of data shall be prescribed in the plan of operation. (2)  All profits of the association shall remain as assets of the association. (3)  The plan of operation shall provide financial incentives or financial penalties, or both, to ensure that assessable insurers write essential property insurance in the coast area. The incentives and penalties may include, but are not limited to, a reduction in recoupable and nonrecoupable assessments, adjustments in the percentage of participation, and other incentives and penalties as provided in the plan of operation.  The commissioner shall approve the plan of operation as provided in Section 83-34-13. SECTION 22.  Section 83-34-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-10.  (1)  In the event of a covered event that may produce losses in excess of funds that may be immediately available to the association, or in the event that the association determines that it will otherwise have a claim deficit or any other deficit, then the association, with consent of the commissioner, shall have the power to levy recoupable and nonrecoupable assessments against assessable insurers based upon their percentage of participation. The minimum reserve, as set forth in the plan of operation, shall not be considered as funds available to the association in determining whether to levy a recoupable or nonrecoupable assessment. (2)  A nonrecoupable assessment levied under this section shall not exceed six percent (6%) of the association's year-end total limits in force for the preceding calendar year, or Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00), whichever is less. Further, in any calendar year, the annual total of all nonrecoupable assessment funds collected shall not exceed, in the aggregate, Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00). SECTION 23.  Section 83-34-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-12.  The recoupable or nonrecoupable assessment of an assessable insurer may, after hearing, be ordered deferred, in whole or in part, upon application by the insurer if, in the opinion of the commissioner, payment of the recoupable or nonrecoupable assessment would render the insurer insolvent or in danger of insolvency, or would otherwise leave the insurer in such a condition that further transaction of the insurer's business would be hazardous to its policyholders, creditors, assessable insurers, subscribers, stockholders or the public.  If that payment of a recoupable or nonrecoupable assessment against an assessable insurer is deferred by order of the commissioner, in whole or in part, the amount by which the recoupable or nonrecoupable assessment is deferred shall be assessed against other assessable insurers in the same manner as provided in Section 83-34-9. SECTION 24.  Section 83-34-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-13.  (1)  Within forty-five (45) days after March 22, 2007, the directors of the association shall submit to the commissioner for review and approval a proposed plan of operation revised to be consistent with the provisions of Chapter 425, Laws of 2007.  The association shall maintain a plan of operation.  The plan shall provide for the efficient, economical, fair and nondiscriminatory administration of the association.  The plan may include the establishment of a minimum reserve, methods for the nonrecoupable assessment of all assessable insurers for deficits and expenses, the establishment of necessary facilities, management of the association, underwriting standards, procedures for determining the amounts of insurance to be provided to specific risks, time limits and procedures for processing   applications for insurance, and for such other provisions as may be deemed necessary by the board to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The plan of operation shall include in the plan of operation a mechanism for recoupment of recoupable assessments. (2)  The plan of operation shall provide financial incentives or financial penalties, or both, to ensure that assessable insurers write essential property insurance in the coast area. The incentives and penalties may include, but are not limited to, a reduction in nonrecoupable assessments, adjustments in the percentage of participation, and other incentives and penalties as provided in the plan of operation. (3)  The plan of operation shall provide (a) that the association shall offer a two percent (2%) deductible for loss from named storms; and (b) that the association shall also offer options for other deductibles for loss from named storms with appropriate rate reductions that shall include at least a twenty percent (20%) deductible for loss from named storms. (4)  The plan of operation shall provide that the association use actuarially appropriate geographical zones for rating and for the use of credits and penalties to encourage voluntary writing in the coast area. (5)  The commissioner shall approve the plan of operation and all amendments before they become effective. It is the obligation of the commissioner to confirm that such plan fulfills the purposes of this chapter.  If the commissioner approves a proposed plan or amendment, he shall certify the approval to the directors, and the plan, or amendment thereto, shall become effective ten (10) days after such certification. If the commissioner disapproves all or any part of the proposed plan of operation, or amendment thereto, he shall return the same to the directors with a written statement giving the reasons for disapproval and any recommendations the commissioner may wish to make.  Within ten (10) days thereafter, the directors may alter the plan or amendment in accordance with the commissioner's recommendation or may return a new plan to the commissioner.  The commissioner shall consider the proposals and shall then promulgate and place into effect a plan of operation certifying the same to the directors of the association after approval by the board of directors.  Any such plan promulgated by the commissioner shall take effect ten (10) days after certification to the directors. (6)  The commissioner may review the plan of operation at any time he deems expedient or prudent.  After review of the plan, the commissioner may amend the plan after consultation with the directors of the association and upon certification to the directors of the amendment. SECTION 25.  Section 83-34-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-15.  (1)  (a)  Any person having an insurable interest in insurable property is entitled to apply to the association for such coverage.  Applications shall be made on behalf of the owner of the insurable interest by a licensed resident broker or agent authorized by him.  Applications shall be submitted on forms prescribed by the association. (b)  The association may require an inspection of any properties after application or request for renewal and may charge a fee for such inspection. (c)  The term "insurable interest" as used in this subsection shall be deemed to include any lawful and substantial economic interest in the safety or preservation of property from loss, destruction or pecuniary damage. (2)  If the association determines that the property is insurable and that there is no unpaid premium due from the applicant for prior insurance on the property, the association, upon receipt of the premium or such portion thereof as is prescribed in the plan of operation, shall cause to be issued, or issue, a policy of essential property insurance.  Such coverage shall be dependent upon the timely payment and actual receipt by the association of premiums or premium installments as provided for at the time of application.  Coverage limits shall be determined by the value of the insurable property at the time the policy is issued subject to maximum limits which shall be set forth under the plan of operation. (3)  If the association for any reason denies an application and refuses to issue or cause to be issued an insurance policy to any applicant, or takes no action on an application within the time prescribed in the plan of operation, such applicant may appeal to the commissioner.  The commissioner or a designated member of his staff, after reviewing the facts, may direct the association to issue or cause to be issued an insurance policy to the applicant; however, no coverage shall be in effect until such time as the premium is paid and the policy issued.  In carrying out his duties pursuant to this section, the commissioner may request, and the association shall provide, any information the commissioner deems necessary to a determination concerning the reasons for the denial or delay of the application. SECTION 26.  Section 83-34-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-16.  The Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association shall provide a premium discount for any individual who builds a "fortified home" pursuant to the Institute for Business and Home Safety (IBHS).  Licensed architects, engineers or inspectors certified by the Department of Insurance shall determine whether a dwelling meets the criteria for a "fortified home" pursuant to the Institute for Business and Home Safety.  The Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association shall provide a premium discount for any individual who improves his residence with demonstrated mitigation measures that provide protection against damages caused by a windstorm or hurricane. SECTION 27.  Section 83-34-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-17.  The rates, rating plans, rating rules, forms and endorsements applicable to the insurance written by the association shall be those approved for use of the association by the commissioner.  Rates shall be nondiscriminatory as to the same class of risk. SECTION 28.  Section 83-34-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-19.  (1)  Any assessable insurer or other licensed insurer, or agent placing insurance through a nonadmitted insurer, who may be aggrieved by an act, order, ruling or decision of the association may, within thirty (30) days after such ruling, appeal to the commissioner.  Any hearings held by the commissioner pursuant to such an appeal shall be in accordance with the procedure set forth in the insurance laws of Mississippi.  The commissioner is authorized to appoint a member of his staff for the purpose of hearing such appeals, and a ruling based upon such hearing shall have the same effect as if heard by the commissioner. All assessable insurers or other licensed insurers, or agents placing insurance through a nonadmitted insurer, aggrieved by any order or decision of the commissioner may appeal to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, consistent with the insurance laws of the State of Mississippi. (2)  The association and any assessable insurer, other licensed insurer or agent placing insurance through a nonadmitted insurer that may be aggrieved by an act, order, ruling or decision of the commissioner may, within thirty (30) days after such act, order, ruling or decision, appeal to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, consistent with the insurance laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 29.  Section 83-34-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-21.  All reports of inspection performed by or on behalf of the association shall be made available to the assessable insurers of the association, applicants, agents, brokers and the commissioner. SECTION 30.  Section 83-34-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-23.  There shall be no liability on the part of the insurance commissioner or any of his staff and representatives for any action taken under and pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.  There shall be no liability on the part of the association, its agents, representatives or employees, the members of the board, or any assessable insurer of the association, except for the specific obligations stated in any contract of insurance and the duty to pay assessments as provided in this chapter. SECTION 31.  Section 83-34-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-25.  The association shall file in the office of the commissioner on or before March 1 of each year a statement which shall summarize the transactions, conditions, operations and affairs of the association during the preceding fiscal year ending December 31.  Such statement shall contain such matters and information as are prescribed by the commissioner and shall be in such form as required by him. The commissioner may at any time require the association to furnish to him any additional information with respect to its transactions or any other matter which the commissioner deems to be material to assist him in evaluating the operation and experience of the association. SECTION 32.  Section 83-34-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-27.  The commissioner may from time to time make an examination into the affairs of the association when he deems prudent and, in undertaking such examination, may hold a public hearing.  The expenses of such examination shall be borne and paid by the association.  The association and the commissioner may from time to time make an examination of the data and payments of assessable insurers or other licensed insurers or agents placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers as it deems prudent.  The expenses of such examination shall be borne and paid by the examined party or entity.  Any person noticed for such examination may appeal the examination or the cost thereof, or both, to the commissioner. SECTION 33.  Section 83-34-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-29.  The association is authorized to promulgate rules for the implementation of this chapter, subject to the approval of the commissioner. SECTION 34.  Section 83-34-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-31.  (1)  The board of directors, subject to the approval of the commissioner, shall have the power and authority to issue bonds, and the power and authority to enter into loans, letters of credit, lines of credit, and other forms of indebtedness, as needed for operations, the purchase of reinsurance, claim losses, and incurred but not reported claims. (2)  The bonds must be in a form approved by the commissioner.  With approval of the commissioner, the association may issue bonds or incur other indebtedness to retire or consolidate bonds as appropriate.  Bonds and other debt obligations issued by or on behalf of the association are not to be considered "state bonds" and shall not be an obligation of the state. (3)  The state hereby covenants with holders of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter that the state will not limit, alter or deny the duties and obligations of this chapter, and of the association and the commissioner as established by this chapter, necessary to fulfill the terms of any agreements with bondholders, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such bondholders as long as any such bonds remain outstanding unless adequate provision has been made for the payment of such bonds pursuant to the documents authorizing the issuance of such bonds. SECTION 35.  Section 83-34-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-33.  (1)  When the association knows or has reason to believe that (a) it has or will incur losses from a covered event that exceeds available surplus, reinsurance, recoupable or nonrecoupable assessments and other reasonably available assets of the association, such that one or more bond issues or other financing, or both, will be necessary to pay claims losses and other related expenses, or (b) the association has an excess deficit that cannot be reasonably resolved by income available to the association above the minimum reserve, then the association shall immediately give notice to the commissioner and request that the commissioner implement an excess deficit surcharge on all property and casualty insurance premiums for insurance for property and operations in this state designed to recover to the association the amount of all such bonds and other indebtedness resulting from the covered event, or other deficit. (2)  All such bonds and loans are secured by the power and duty of the commissioner to implement surcharges against all property and casualty insurance premiums for insurance for property and activities in this state sufficient to repay the bonds or loans, or both. (3)  If any of the bonds remain unsold sixty (60) days after issuance, the commissioner shall require all assessable insurers to purchase the bonds, which purchased bonds shall be treated as admitted assets; each assessable insurer shall be required to purchase that percentage of the unsold portion of the bond issue that equals the assessable insurer's current percentage of participation.  An assessable insurer shall not be required to purchase the bonds to the extent that the commissioner determines that the purchase would endanger or impair the solvency of the insurer.  The bonds must be in a form approved by the commissioner. With approval of the commissioner, the association may issue bonds or incur other indebtedness to retire or consolidate bonds as appropriate.  Bonds and other debt obligations issued by or on behalf of the association are not to be considered "state bonds" and shall not be an obligation of the state. (4)  At such time as the commissioner can reasonably estimate the amount of bonds or indebtedness, or both, necessitated by a covered event, and in no event more than ninety (90) days from the notice given by the association, the commissioner shall have the duty and the power to implement an excess deficit surcharge on all property and casualty insurance premiums for insurance for property and activities in this state.  "Premiums" includes premiums for policies issued by or for the association and by or for the Mississippi Residential Property Insurance Underwriting Association.  "Premiums" shall not include premiums for workers' compensation coverage, premiums for medical malpractice liability coverage including medical malpractice liability coverage issued by companies created under Section 83-47-1 et seq., nor any premiums for coverage by insurance pools or plans administered by or through the State of Mississippi. (5)  If the excess deficit surcharge is designed to repay bonds, it shall be designated as such and all funds recovered from the excess deficit surcharge shall be used for repayment of the bonds for which it was implemented, until such time as the bonds have been paid or redeemed. (6)  If the excess deficit surcharge is designed to repay a specific indebtedness incurred for losses from a specific covered event, it shall be designated as such and all funds recovered from the excess deficit surcharge shall be used for repayment of the indebtedness for which it was implemented, until such time as the indebtedness has been paid or redeemed. (7)  Such excess deficit surcharge shall be specifically identified on either the premium statements or the policy declarations pages or other appropriate policy forms as relating to the specific covered event losses or bonds or indebtedness for which it was implemented.  The commissioner shall name each such excess deficit surcharge so that it can be uniformly identified by insurers and agents. (8)  The excess deficit surcharge shall be a percentage of the total policy premium but the excess deficit surcharge shall not be considered premium and is not subject to premium taxes or commissions.  However, failure to pay the excess deficit surcharge shall be treated the same as failure to pay premium.  "Total policy premium" includes taxes and commissions. (9)  The commissioner shall implement an appropriate excess deficit surcharge percentage sufficient to recover the amount necessary for repayment of bonds and indebtedness necessitated by a covered event, or the resolution of other deficit, as applicable.  If at any time such surcharge shall be insufficient, the commissioner shall increase the excess deficit surcharge as necessary and appropriate.  The commissioner shall cease excess deficit surcharges as he determines appropriate funds have been collected.  However, the commissioner shall endeavor to apply excess deficit surcharges on a one-year basis in order to promote consistency, nondiscrimination and fairness among policyholders purchasing or renewing insurance during that year.  Any collections in excess of the amounts needed shall be assets of the association for investment and other uses. (10)  Each licensed insurer issuing insurance for property and casualty risks in the state and each agent placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers, shall collect the excess deficit surcharges established by the commissioner under the authority of this section.  Funds collected by such licensed insurers and agents placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers as excess deficit surcharges authorized by this section shall be collected and held in trust and shall be fully remitted to the association on a quarterly basis with forms providing appropriate information as designed by the association.  Insurers and agents shall remit such funds to the association within twenty (20) days after the end of each quarter.  At such time the insurers and agents shall further remit to the association all interest earned on the excess deficit surcharge funds. (11)  The association and the commissioner are both specifically given the power to audit licensed insurers and agents placing insurance through nonadmitted insurers to confirm the accuracy of remittances of excess deficit surcharges at the expense of the licensed insurers and agents. (12) The commissioner has the duty and power to adjust the percentage of any excess deficit surcharge previously established as he finds appropriate taking into consideration any relevant factors, including, but not limited to, consolidation or replacement of bonds, any additional indebtedness resulting from a covered event, the rate of recovery, anticipated length of total recovery, and impact of other covered events; however, the commissioner shall not reduce the amount of excess deficit surcharges implemented and designated to pay or redeem bonds, or other indebtedness below the amount necessary to timely pay or redeem such bonds, or other indebtedness. (13)  When the association knows or has reason to believe that excess deficit surcharges authorized by this section previously established by the commissioner will be insufficient to timely pay or redeem bonds or indebtedness, the association shall immediately give notice to the commissioner.  The commissioner shall alter such excess deficit surcharge as necessary to timely pay or redeem bonds or pay other indebtedness. (14)  The association shall report quarterly to the commissioner providing all financial information for each excess deficit surcharge authorized by this section, including: (a)  The original and current outstanding indebtedness of all bonds and loans; (b)  Total excess deficit surcharge funds recovered to date; and (c)  Any information requested by the commissioner. (15)  The commissioner may request, and the association shall provide, on an immediate basis to the commissioner any financial information or other information concerning any excess deficit surcharge.  This section shall not limit the reporting requirements provided by Section 83-34-25. SECTION 36.  Section 83-34-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-35.  In order to avoid or lessen the possibility and amount of excess deficit surcharges authorized by this chapter, the commissioner shall approve rates for policies issued by the association at least adequate to fund annual reinsurance above a self-insured retention of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) that, combined with any readily available reserves of the association, is sufficient to cover at least the probable maximum losses from a storm expected to occur once every one hundred (100) years as predicted by a model or method approved by the commissioner for the properties insured by the association at the time the reinsurance was negotiated.  The amount of reinsurance in the foregoing rate adequacy requirement shall increase every two (2) years by increasing the probable maximum loss by five (5) years, until such time as the probable maximum loss insured is for a storm expected to occur every one hundred fifty (150) years.  The commissioner may approve rates in excess of the minimums required by this section as consistent with his duties and the insurance laws of the State of Mississippi.  Any self-insured retention related to the purchase of reinsurance shall be subject to the prior approval of the commissioner. SECTION 37.  Section 83-34-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-34-37.  (1)  (a)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association Reinsurance Assistance Fund."  The fund shall consist of monies deposited therein as provided under Section 83-34-39, monies appropriated by act of the Legislature and monies from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund; however, any monies in excess of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year that have not been appropriated shall lapse into the State General Fund. (b)  Monies in the special fund may be used by the Department of Insurance, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only for the purpose of assisting the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association in defraying expenses and costs for reinsurance under Section 83-34-1 et seq.  The association may use any such funds received from the Department of Insurance for the sole purpose of defraying expenses and costs for reinsurance.  Monies in the fund used for the purposes described in this paragraph (b) shall be in addition to other funds available from any other source for such purposes. (c)  Monies in the special fund may not be used, expended or transferred for any other purpose except upon amendment to this section by a bill enacted by the Legislature with a vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of each house present and voting. (2)  (a)  The Commissioner of Insurance shall file a report with the Joint Legislative Budget Committee not later than September 1 of each year, recommending the amount of assistance, if any, needed by the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association for reinsurance expenses and costs.  The Commissioner of Insurance also shall provide a copy of the report to the Attorney General and the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority. (b)  The Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association shall prepare and file detailed reports with the Clerk of the House of Representatives, Secretary of the Senate, Commissioner of Insurance, Attorney General and Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority regarding the receipt and expenditure of monies by the association under this section. SECTION 38.  Section 83-1-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-1-191.  (1)  There is established within the Department of Insurance a Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  This section does not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of residential property or commercial property in this state.  Implementation of this program is subject to the availability of funds that may be appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose.  The program may develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach for hurricane damage mitigation that may include the following: (a)  Cost-benefit study on wind hazard mitigation construction measures.  The performance of a cost-benefit study to establish the most appropriate wind hazard mitigation construction measures for both new construction and the retrofitting of existing construction for both residential and commercial facilities within the wind-borne debris regions of Mississippi as defined by the International Building Code.  The recommended wind construction techniques shall be based on both the newly adopted Mississippi building code sections for wind load design and the wind-borne debris region.  The list of construction measures to be considered for evaluation in the cost-benefit study shall be based on scientifically established and sound, but common, construction techniques that go above and beyond the basic recommendations in the adopted building codes. This allows residents to utilize multiple options that will further reduce risk and loss and still be awarded for their endeavors with appropriate wind insurance discounts.  It is recommended that existing accepted scientific studies that validate the wind hazard construction techniques benefits and effects be taken into consideration when establishing the list of construction techniques that homeowners and business owners can employ.  This will ensure that only established construction measures that have been studied and modeled as successful mitigation measures will be considered to reduce the chance of including risky or unsound data that will cost both the property owner and state unnecessary losses.  The cost-benefit study shall be based on actual construction cost data collected for several types of residential construction and commercial construction materials, building techniques and designs that are common to the region.  The study shall provide as much information as possible that will enhance the data and options provided to the public, so that homeowners and business owners can make informed and educated decisions as to their level of involvement.  Based on the construction data, modeling shall be performed on a variety of residential and commercial designs, so that a broad enough representative spectrum of data can be obtained.  The data from the study will be utilized in a report to establish tables reflecting actuarially appropriate levels of wind insurance discounts (in percentages) for each mitigation construction technique/combination of techniques.  This report will be utilized as a guide for the Department of Insurance and the insurance industry for developing actuarially appropriate discounts, credits or other rate differentials, or appropriate reductions in deductibles, for properties on which fixtures or construction techniques demonstrated to reduce the amount of loss in a windstorm have been installed or implemented.  Additional data that will enhance the program, such as studies to reflect property value increases for retrofitting or building to the established wind hazard mitigation construction techniques and cost comparison data collected to establish the value of this program against the investment required to include the mitigation measures, also may be provided. (b)  Wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections. (i)  Home-retrofit inspections of site-built, residential property, including single-family, two-family, three-family or four-family residential units, and a set of representative commercial facilities may be offered to determine what mitigation measures are needed and what improvements to existing residential properties are needed to reduce the property's vulnerability to hurricane damage.  A state program may be established within the Department of Insurance to provide homeowners and business owners wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections.  The inspections provided to homeowners and business owners, at a minimum, must include: 1.  A home inspection and report that summarizes the results and identifies corrective actions a homeowner may take to mitigate hurricane damage. 2.  A range of cost estimates regarding the mitigation features. 3.  Insurer-specific information regarding premium discounts correlated to recommended mitigation features identified by the inspection. 4.  A hurricane resistance rating scale specifying the home's current as well as projected wind resistance capabilities. This data may be provided by trained and certified inspectors in standardized reporting formats and forms to ensure all data collected during inspections is equivalent in style and content that allows construction data, estimates and discount information to be easily assimilated into a database.  Data pertaining to the number of inspections and inspection reports may be stored in a state database for evaluation of the program's success and review of state goals in reducing wind hazard loss in the state. (ii)  To qualify for selection by the department as a provider of wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections services, the entity shall, at a minimum, and on a form and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner: 1.  Use wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspectors who: a.  Have prior experience in residential and/or commercial construction or inspection and have received specialized training in hurricane mitigation procedures through the state certified program.  In order to qualify for training in the inspection process, the individual should be either a licensed building code official, a licensed contractor or inspector in the State of Mississippi, or a civil engineer. b.  Have undergone drug testing and background checks. c.  Have been certified through a state mandated training program, in a manner satisfactory to the department, to conduct the inspections. d.  Have not been convicted of a felony crime of violence or of a sexual offense; have not received a first-time offender pardon or nonadjudication order for a felony crime of violence or of a sexual offense; or have not entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony charge of violence or of a sexual offense. e. Submit a statement authorizing the Commissioner of Insurance to order fingerprint analysis or any other analysis or documents deemed necessary by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying the criminal history of the individual.  The commissioner shall have the authority to conduct criminal history verification on a local, state or national level, and shall have the authority to require the individual to pay for the costs of such criminal history verification. 2.  Provide a quality assurance program including a reinspection component. 3.  Have data collection equipment and computer systems, so that data can be submitted electronically to the state's database of inspection reports, insurance certificates, and other industry information related to this program.  It is mandatory that all inspectors provide original copies to the property owner of any inspection reports, estimates, etc., pertaining to the inspection and keep a copy of all inspection materials on hand for state audits. (c) Financial grants to retrofit properties.  Financial grants may be used to encourage single-family, site-built, owner-occupied, residential property owners or commercial property owners to retrofit their properties to make them less vulnerable to hurricane damage.  No financial grant made under this section shall exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per recipient. (d)  Education and consumer awareness.  Multimedia public education, awareness and advertising efforts designed to specifically address mitigation techniques may be employed, as well as a component to support ongoing consumer resources and referral services.  In addition, all insurance companies shall provide notification to their clients regarding the availability of this program, participation details, and directions to the state website promoting the program, along with appropriate contact phone numbers to the state agency administrating the program.  The notification to the clients must be sent by the insurance company within thirty (30) days after filing their insurance discount schedules with the Department of Insurance. (e)  Advisory council.  There is created an advisory council to provide advice and assistance to the program administrator with regard to his or her administration of the program.  The advisory council shall consist of: (i)  An agent, selected by the Independent Insurance Agents of Mississippi. (ii)  Two (2) representatives of residential property insurers, selected by the Department of Insurance. (iii)  One (1) representative of homebuilders, selected by the Home Builders Association of Mississippi. (iv)  The Chairman of the House Insurance Committee, or his designee. (v)  The Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, or his designee. (vi)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association, or his designee. (vii)  The Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, or his designee. Members appointed under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) shall serve at the pleasure of the Department of Insurance.  All other members shall serve as voting ex officio members. Members of the advisory council who are not legislators, state officials or state employees shall be compensated at the per diem rate authorized by Section 25-3-69, and shall be reimbursed in accordance with Section 25-3-41, for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Legislative members of the advisory council shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same manner as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem or expense for attending meetings of the advisory council may be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No advisory council member may incur per diem, travel or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote, at a meeting of the council, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of the meeting. Nonlegislative members shall be paid from any funds made available to the advisory council for that purpose. (f)  Rules and regulations.  The Department of Insurance may adopt rules and regulations governing the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  The department also may adopt rules and regulations establishing priorities for grants provided under this section based on objective criteria that gives priority to reducing the state's probable maximum loss from hurricanes. However, pursuant to this overall goal, the department may further establish priorities based on the insured value of the dwelling, whether or not the dwelling is insured by the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association and whether or not the area under consideration has sufficient resources and the ability to perform the retrofitting required. (2)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Insurance from entering into an agreement with any other appropriate state agency to assist with or perform any of the duties set forth hereunder. (3)  The Department of Insurance shall issue a request for proposals to contract with a third party for the administration of the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  The contract for the third-party administrator shall be funded from monies in the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program Fund created in subsection (4) of this section, and that amount shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the funds appropriated to the Department of Insurance for the program. If the third-party administrator selected through the request for proposals is replaced or is otherwise changed, the Department of Insurance shall notify the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations and Insurance Committees. (4)  There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program Fund.  The fund shall consist of any monies from any source that are designated or made available for deposit into the fund.  The Department of Insurance may apply for any federal or private grants to provide additional funds for the special fund.  Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Department of Insurance, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes as provided in this section.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. (5)  This section shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2028. SECTION 39.  Section 83-1-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-1-201.  (1)  There is created the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Coordinating Council for the purpose of developing and implementing a comprehensive and coordinated approach for windstorm mitigation.  The council shall consist of the following: (a)  The Commissioner of Insurance, or his designee, to serve ex officio; (b)  The Chairman of the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Insurance Windstorm Underwriting Association, or his designee, to serve ex officio; (c)  Two (2) members who are property and casualty insurance providers appointed by the Governor, to serve at his will and pleasure; (d)  Two (2) members who are insurance producers from the Coast Area, as defined under Section 83-34-1, appointed by the Commissioner of Insurance, to serve at his will and pleasure; (e)  One (1) member from the Home Builders Association of Mississippi or the State Board of Contractors appointed by the Commissioner of Insurance, to serve at his will and pleasure; (f)  One (1) nonvoting member from the Institute for Business and Home Safety appointed by the Governor, to serve at his will and pleasure; (g)  One (1) member who is a representative of the state institutions of higher learning appointed by the Commissioner of Higher Education to serve at his will and pleasure, nonvoting; (h)  The Director of the Mississippi State Rating Bureau, or his designee, to serve ex officio, nonvoting; and (i)  The Chief Deputy State Fire Marshal, or his designee, to serve ex officio, nonvoting. (2)  The Commissioner of Insurance shall convene the first meeting of the council within ninety (90) days of July 1, 2011, and shall act as temporary chairman until the council elects from its members a chairman and vice chairman.  The council shall adopt regulations consistent with this section, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Insurance.  The council may also consider the mitigation measures and initiatives referenced under Section 83-1-191 in developing and implementing a windstorm mitigation program.  A meeting may be called by the chairman on his own initiative and must be called by him at the request of three (3) or more members of the council.  Each member must be notified by the chairman in writing of the time and place of the meeting at least seven (7) days before the meeting.  Four (4) voting members constitute a quorum.  Each meeting is open to the public.  An official decision of the council may be made only by a vote of a majority of those voting members in attendance at the meeting. (3)  The Mississippi Building Codes Council created under Section 17-2-3 shall serve as an advisory council to the council created under this section. (4)  (a)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Fund."  The fund shall consist of monies appropriated by act of the Legislature and monies from any other public or private source designated for deposit into the fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (b)  Monies in the special fund may be used by the Department of Insurance, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only for the purposes of assisting the Mississippi Windstorm Mitigation Coordinating Council in developing and implementing a comprehensive and coordinated approach for windstorm mitigation including providing grants, developing education programs, providing funds for training local officials or providing any other assistance consistent with these purposes. SECTION 40.  Section 27-15-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-15-103.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 83-61-11, in addition to the license tax now or hereafter provided by law, which tax shall be paid when the company enters or is admitted to do business in this state, there is hereby levied and imposed upon all foreign insurance companies and associations, including life insurance companies and associations, health, accident and industrial insurance companies and associations, fire and casualty insurance companies and associations, and all other foreign insurance companies and associations of every kind and description, an additional annual license or privilege tax of three percent (3%) of the gross amount of premium receipts received from, and on insurance policies and contracts written in, or covering risks located in this state, except for premiums received on policies issued to fund a deferred compensation plan qualified under Section 457 of the Federal Tax Code for federal tax exemption.  In determining said amount of premiums, there shall be deducted therefrom premiums received for reinsurance from companies authorized to do business in this state, cash dividends paid under policy contracts in this state, and premiums returned to policyholders and cancellations on accounts of policies not taken, and, in the case of mutual insurance companies (including interinsurance and reciprocal exchanges, but not including mutual life, accident, health or industrial insurance companies) any refund made or credited to the policyholder other than for losses. The term "premium" as used herein shall also include policy fees, membership fees, and all other fees collected by the companies.  No credit or deduction from gross premium receipts shall be allowed for any commission, fee or compensation paid to any agent, solicitor or representative.  Provided, however, that any foreign insurance carrier selected to furnish service to the State of Mississippi under the State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan shall not be required to pay the annual license or privilege tax on the premiums collected for coverage under the said plan. (2)  In the event that the Mississippi Supreme Court or another court finally adjudicates that any tax levied prior to July 1, 1985, under the provisions of this section was collected unconstitutionally and that a liability for a credit or refund for such collection has accrued, then the rate of tax set forth above shall be increased to four percent (4%) for a period of six (6) years beginning July 1 following such adjudication. (3)  The taxes herein levied and imposed for the calendar year 1982 and all calendar years thereafter shall be reduced by the net amount of income tax paid to this state for the preceding calendar year, provided, in no event may the credit be taken more than once. The credit herein authorized shall, in no event, be greater than the premium tax due under this section; it being the purpose and intent of this paragraph that whichever of the annual insurance premium tax or the income tax is greater in amount shall be paid. SECTION 41.  Section 27-15-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-15-109.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 83-61-11, there is hereby levied and imposed upon each domestic company doing business in this state an annual tax of three percent (3%) of the gross amount of premiums collected by such domestic company on insurance policies and contracts written in, or covering risks located in this state, except for premiums received on policies issued to fund a retirement, thrift or deferred compensation plan qualified under Section 401, Section 403 or Section 457 of the Federal Tax Code for federal tax exemption. Provided, however, that a domestic insurance company against which is levied additional premium tax under retaliatory laws of other states in which it does business, as a result of the tax increase provided by Sections 27-15-103 through 27-15-117, may deduct the total of such additional retaliatory tax from the state income tax due by it to the State of Mississippi.  The insurance carriers selected to furnish service to the State of Mississippi, under the State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan, shall not be required to pay the premium tax levied against insurance companies under this section on the premiums collected for coverage under the state employees plan. (2)  Except as expressly provided by subsection (1) of this section, all of the provisions of Sections 27-15-103 through 27-15-117 shall be applicable to such domestic insurance companies.  However, the statement filed with the State Tax Commission by domestic insurance companies as provided in Section 27-15-107 shall include therein a sworn statement of all additional retaliatory premium taxes paid by them to other states as a result of the increase in premium taxes imposed by Sections 27-15-103 through 27-15-117, itemized by states to which paid. (3)  In the event that the Mississippi Supreme Court or another court finally adjudicates that any tax levied prior to July 1, 1985, under the provisions of this section was collected unconstitutionally and that a liability for a credit or refund for such collection has accrued, then the rate of tax set forth above shall be increased to four percent (4%) for a period of six (6) years beginning July 1 following such adjudication. SECTION 42.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.